Georgia, session 2025_26, HB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-1-8 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to safe operations
of motor carriers, commercial motor vehicles, and drivers and safe transportation of
hazardous materials, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Commissioner' means the commissioner of public safety.
(2) 'Department' means the Department of Public Safety.
(3) 'Present regulations' means the regulations promulgated under 49 C.F.R. in force and
effect on January 1, 2024 2025."
H. B. 114
- 1 -

LC 39 4443/AP
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 114
- 2 -